District of Columbia statutes.
16-1106

Performance of contract by vendee as precluding vendor from recovery.

Where real property has been sold under a written contract executed by the vendor, and there has been such a performance of its terms by the vendee as would entitle him to a decree for a conveyance of the legal title, without condition, the vendor may not recover the property from the vendee.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1106.
1973 Ed., § 16-1106.